District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “School Food Waste Reduction and Composting Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014, effective
March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 103a(b) (D.C. Official Code 8-1031.03a(b)) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (2A) to read as follows:

“(2A) Beginning January 1, 2027, District of Columbia Public Schools and public charter
schools, including any food service program or vendor operating on their behalf, that prepare or
handle food waste onsite.”.
(b) Section 104a (D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.04a) is amended by adding new
subsections (e) and (f) to read as follows:
“(e)(1) DPW shall be responsible for compliance guidance, technical assistance, and
enforcement of organics separation requirements applicable to District of Columbia Public
Schools (“DCPS”) and public charter school meal programs under this act.
“(2) The Department of General Services shall ensure the provision, installation,
and maintenance of necessary containers, signage, and collection infrastructure to support
compliance with this section at District-owned or District-leased public school facilities and shall
coordinate with public charter school operators or their designees to support the provision of
such infrastructure at public charter school facilities.
“(3) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall coordinate with DPW and
the Department of General Services, and with food service providers operating on behalf of
schools, to support implementation within school meal programs and to facilitate the collection
and transmission of reporting data to DPW.
“(f)(1) Within 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Mayor shall issue
rules to implement this section for public school and public charter school meal programs,
including establishing a corrective action process for DCPS and public charter school meal
programs that are not in compliance with the requirements of this section, including timeframes
for remediation, technical assistance, and follow-up review.

“(2) Beginning October 1 of the first full fiscal year after the effective date of this
subsection, and annually thereafter, the Department of Public Works shall submit to the Council
a report that includes:
“(A) A summary of compliance and contamination trends for public
school and public charter school meal programs;
“(B) A description of technical assistance activities and corrective actions
undertaken during the preceding fiscal year;
“(C) Identification of recurring implementation barriers, including barriers
related to equipment, staffing, contracts, and collection logistics; and
“(D) A summary of school food donation activity and barriers to donation,
based on information provided by the Office of the State Superintendent of Education.”.
Sec. 3. Section 203(d) of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C.
Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-822.03(d)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools are
encouraged to establish share tables and to donate excess edible food, as practicable.”.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “share table participation” and
inserting the phrase “share table participation, including whether the school donates excess
edible food, a summary of donation practices and partners, any barriers to donating excess edible
food, and steps taken to expand donation capacity, ” in its place.
(c) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) Information collected pursuant to this subsection shall be reported through existing
school health and wellness reporting systems administered by the Office of the State

Superintendent of Education and transmitted to the Department of Public Works for inclusion in
reporting in accordance with section 104a of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management
Amendment Act of 2014, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; D.C. Official Code § 8-
1031.04a).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).